Missouri, session 2026, HB2393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 173, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto four new
sections, to be known as sections 160.014, 160.015, 173.001, and 173.002, to read as follows:
160.014. 1. As used in this section and section 160.015, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic", the International Holocaust Remembrance
Alliance's (IHRA) Working Definition of Antisemitism, including its contemporary
examples, as it was adopted on May 26, 2016, as a tool and guide for recognizing and
combating antisemitism;
(2) "Educational institution", each public school and school district in this state.
2. Each educational institution shall treat harassment of or discrimination
against students or employees, or harassment or discrimination resulting from
institutional policies or programs on such educational institution's campuses, that is
motivated by or including antisemitism in an identical manner to discrimination
motivated by race.
3. (1) Each educational institution shall integrate the definition of antisemitism
in this section into such educational institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall prohibit such conduct at or by such educational institution if such
conduct creates an atmosphere or circumstance in which individuals working at,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2393 2
visiting, or attending the educational institution are impeded from their normal course
of work, study, or access to the educational institution and the educational institution's
services and facilities either by physically impeding such activity or by creating an
atmosphere of fear or intimidation.
(2) Prohibited conduct as it relates specifically to antisemitism shall be
incorporated into such educational institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall include penalties for harassment of and discrimination against Jews
in compliance with antidiscrimination regulations promulgated under Title VI of the
federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, by the United States Department of
Education and the United States Department of Justice.
4. (1) Criticism of Israel that is similar to criticism toward any other country
shall not be construed to be antisemitic.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.
160.015. 1. (1) No educational institution shall discriminate because of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a student or
an employee in the state system of public elementary and secondary education.
(2) No person in this state shall, on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin,
sex, disability, religion, or marital status, be excluded from participation in, denied the
benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any program or activity or in any
employment conditions or practices conducted by an educational institution that
receives or benefits from federal or state financial assistance.
2. An educational institution's criteria for admission to a program or course
shall not have the effect of restricting access by persons of a particular race, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
3. (1) All of an educational institution's classes shall be available to all students
without regard to race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to eliminate the provision of programs
designed to meet the needs of students with limited proficiency in English, gifted
students, or students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with special
needs.
4. Guidance services, counseling services, and financial assistance services in an
educational institution shall be available to all students equally and provided in the

HB 2393 3
same manner regardless of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
5. All education programs, activities, and opportunities offered by educational
institutions shall be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
6. (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.
7. (1) Each educational institution shall report incidents and complaints of
antisemitic discrimination or harassment to the Title VI coordinator at the department
of elementary and secondary education.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall establish, maintain, and publicize a formal
reporting process by which students, parents, staff, and faculty can submit complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment.
(3) The Title VI coordinator shall thoroughly investigate all complaints made
under this subsection. After a reasonable investigation, if the coordinator determines
that an educational institution has engaged in, allowed, or failed to sufficiently prohibit
antisemitic discrimination or harassment, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall notify, in writing, the educational institution of such determination and
that such educational institution is required to address the issues described in such
determination within thirty days after receipt of such written notice.
(4) After the expiration of the thirty days to address issues in the coordinator's
determination, if the Title VI coordinator determines the educational institution has
failed to take the necessary actions to address such issues, the department of elementary
and secondary education shall report the coordinator's determination to the United
States Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice by making
a complaint under Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended.
(5) The Title VI coordinator shall compile an annual report on complaints of
antisemitic discrimination and harassment monitored, reported, and investigated under
this section. Such report shall be published on the website of the department of
elementary and secondary education and submitted to the general assembly before July
first of each year.
173.001. 1. As used in this section and section 173.002, the following terms
mean:

HB 2393 4
(1) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic", the International Holocaust Remembrance
Alliance's (IHRA) Working Definition of Antisemitism, including its contemporary
examples, as it was adopted on May 26, 2016, as a tool and guide for recognizing and
combating antisemitism;
(2) "Educational institution", a public postsecondary educational institution
governed or supervised by a:
(a) Board erected under chapter 172, 174, 175, or 178;
(b) Board of trustees of a community college; or
(c) State board for any other technical school.
2. Each educational institution shall treat harassment of or discrimination
against students or employees, or harassment or discrimination resulting from
institutional policies or programs on such educational institution's campuses, that is
motivated by or including antisemitism in an identical manner to discrimination
motivated by race.
3. (1) Each educational institution shall integrate the definition of antisemitism
in this section into such educational institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall prohibit such conduct at or by such educational institution if such
conduct creates an atmosphere or circumstance in which individuals working at,
visiting, or attending the educational institution are impeded from their normal course
of work, study, or access to the educational institution and the educational institution's
services and facilities either by physically impeding such activity or by creating an
atmosphere of fear or intimidation.
(2) Prohibited conduct as it relates specifically to antisemitism shall be
incorporated into such educational institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall include penalties for harassment of and discrimination against Jews
in compliance with antidiscrimination regulations promulgated under Title VI of the
federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, by the United States Department of
Education and the United States Department of Justice.
4. (1) Criticism of Israel that is similar to criticism toward any other country
shall not be construed to be antisemitic.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.

HB 2393 5
173.002. 1. (1) No educational institution shall discriminate because of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a student or
an employee in the state system of public postsecondary education.
(2) No person in this state shall, on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin,
sex, disability, religion, or marital status, be excluded from participation in, denied the
benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any program or activity or in any
employment conditions or practices conducted by an educational institution that
receives or benefits from federal or state financial assistance.
2. An educational institution's criteria for admission to a program or course
shall not have the effect of restricting access by persons of a particular race, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
3. (1) All of an educational institution's classes shall be available to all students
without regard to race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to eliminate the provision of programs
designed to meet the needs of students with limited proficiency in English, gifted
students, or students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with special
needs.
4. Guidance services, counseling services, and financial assistance services in an
educational institution shall be available to all students equally and provided in the
same manner regardless of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
5. All education programs, activities, and opportunities offered by educational
institutions shall be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
6. (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.
7. (1) Each educational institution shall report incidents and complaints of
antisemitic discrimination or harassment to the Title VI coordinator of the coordinating
board for higher education under the department of higher education and workforce
development.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall establish, maintain, and publicize a formal
reporting process by which students, parents, staff, and faculty can submit complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment.

HB 2393 6
(3) The Title VI coordinator shall thoroughly investigate all complaints made
under this subsection. After a reasonable investigation, if the coordinator determines
that an educational institution has engaged in, allowed, or failed to sufficiently prohibit
antisemitic discrimination or harassment, the coordinating board for higher education
shall notify, in writing, the educational institution of such determination and that such
educational institution is required to address the issues described in such determination
within thirty days after receipt of such written notice.
(4) After the expiration of the thirty days to address issues in the coordinator's
determination, if the Title VI coordinator determines the educational institution has
failed to take the necessary actions to address such issues, the coordinating board for
higher education shall report the coordinator's determination to the United States
Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice by making a
complaint under Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended.
(5) The Title VI coordinator shall compile an annual report on complaints of
antisemitic discrimination and harassment monitored, reported, and investigated under
this section. Such report shall be published on the website of the coordinating board for
higher education and submitted to the general assembly before July first of each year.
✔